Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.200

Statute tolled by death.

Limitations on actions against a person who dies before the expiration of the time otherwise limited for commencement thereof are as set forth in chapter 11.40 RCW. Subject to the limitations on claims against a deceased person under chapter 11.40 RCW, if a person entitled to bring an action dies before the expiration of the time limited for the commencement thereof, and the cause of action survives, an action may be commenced by his or her representatives after the expiration of the time and within one year from his or her death.

[ 2011 c 336 s 85; 1989 c 333 s 8; Code 1881 s 38; 1877 p 9 s 38; 1854 p 364 s 12; RRS s 170.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—1989 c 333: See note following RCW 11.40.010.

Decedents, claims against, time limits: RCW 11.40.051, 11.40.060.